Mississippi, session 2026, HB1058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases have the meanings ascribed in this subsection unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "False or secret compartment" means any enclosure that is integrated into or attached to a vehicle, the purpose of which is to conceal, hide or prevent discovery by law enforcement officers of: (i)  A person concealed for an unlawful purpose; (ii)  Controlled substances possessed in violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law; or (iii)  Other contraband. Examples of a false or secret compartment include, but are not limited to:  false, altered or modified fuel tanks; original factory equipment on a vehicle which has been modified; or any compartment, space or box that is added or attached to existing compartments, spaces or boxes of the vehicle. (b) "Vehicle" includes, but is not limited to, cars, trucks, buses, motorcycles, bicycles, aircraft, helicopters, boats, ships, yachts and other vessels. (2)  It may be inferred that an accused person intended to use a false or secret compartment if the person knowingly has a false or secret compartment that: (a)  Is concealing a person for an unlawful purpose; (b)  Is concealing a controlled substance in violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law; (c)  Is concealing other contraband; (d)  Shows evidence of the previous concealment of a person for an unlawful purpose; (e)  Shows evidence of the previous concealment of controlled substances in violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law; or (f)  Shows evidence of the previous concealment of other contraband. (3)  (a)  It is unlawful for a person to knowingly own or operate a vehicle containing a false or secret compartment. (b)  It is unlawful for a person to knowingly install, create, build or fabricate a false or secret compartment in a vehicle. (c)  It is unlawful for a person to knowingly sell, trade or otherwise dispose of a vehicle that is in violation of this section. (4)  (a)  Upon conviction of a violation of this section, a person must be punished by a fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or by confinement in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) nor more than two (2) years, or both. (b)  Upon the arrest of a person who owns or is operating a vehicle that is required to display a license tag and which is in violation of this section, if the vehicle is not otherwise subject to forfeiture under other provisions of law, or not determined to be needed to be held as evidence, the law enforcement officer shall seize the license tag and registration for the vehicle and shall issue a citation for violation of this section and a temporary license tag for the vehicle.  The temporary license tag must be on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue.  A temporary license tag is valid for a period of thirty (30) days from the date of issuance or until the owner of the vehicle provides verification that the vehicle is no longer in violation of this section, whichever occurs first.  The vehicle must be subject to inspection by law enforcement, and if it is determined that the vehicle has been repaired, the license tag and registration must be returned to the owner at that time. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.